Washington statutes.
RCW 36.08.030

Official proceedings not disturbed by transfer.

All assessments and collection of taxes, and all judicial or other official proceedings commenced prior to the governor's proclamation transferring territory to a contiguous county, shall be continued, prosecuted, and completed in the same manner as if no such transfer had been made.

[ 1963 c 4 s 36.08.030. Prior: 1891 c 144 s 3; RRS s 3974.]